zh-TW: 服飾與配件 > 手提包、皮夾和箱子 > 手提包: 後背包; 法棍包; 圓桶包; 沙灘包; 腰包; 水桶包; 手拿包; 兩用包; 斜背包; 醫生包; 信封手拿包; 折疊手拿包; 半月包; 流浪包; 晚宴包; 毛絨包; 波特利包; 馬鞍包; 劍橋包; 雙肩後背包; 購物包包; 單肩包; 梯形托特包
en: Apparel & Accessories > Handbags, Wallets & Cases > Handbags: Backpack Handbags; Baguette Handbags; Barrel Bags; Beach Bags; Belt Bags; Bucket Bags; Clutch Bags; Convertible Bags; Cross Body Bags; Doctor Bags; Envelope Clutches; Fold Over Clutches; Half-Moon Bags; Hobo Bags; Minaudieres; Muff Clutches & Bags; Potli Bags; Saddle Bags; Satchel Bags; School Bags; Shopper Bags; Shoulder Bags; Trapezoid Bags
pt-PT: Acessórios e vestuário > Sacos de mão, carteiras e malas > Sacos de mão: Malas mochila; Malas baguette; Malas cilíndricas; Malas de praia; Bolsas de cinto; Malas bucket; Malas de mão; Malas conversíveis; Malas a tiracolo; Malas gladstone; Malas envelope; Malas dobráveis; Malas em meia-lua; Malas hobo; Minaudières; Malas e malas de mão de pelo; Sacos potli; Alforjes; Mala tipo carteiro; Malas escolares; Malas shopper; Malas de ombro; Malas trapezoidais
hu: Ruházat és kiegészítők > Kézitáskák, pénztárcák és tokok > Kézitáskák: Hátizsák fazonú táskák; Baguette kézitáskák; Hordótáskák; Strandtáskák; Övtáskák; Vödörtáskák; Estélyi táskák; Átalakítható táskák; Keresztpántos táskák; Orvosi táskák; Borítéktáskák; Hajtogatós táskák; Félhold-táskák; Hobo-táskák; Minaudiérek; Muff-táskák; Potli táskák; Nyeregtáskák; Csattal záródó táskák; Iskolatáskák; Vásárlótáskák; Válltáskák; Trapéztáskák
nl: Kleding en accessoires > Handtassen, portefeuilles en koffers > Handtassen: Rugzaktassen; Baguette-handtassen; Vatzakken; Strandtassen; Heuptassen; Emmertassen; Avondtassen; Converteerbare tassen; Crossbodytassen; Dokterstassen; Envelop-avondtassen; Omvouwbare avondtassen; Halvemaantassen; Hobotassen; Minaudières; Moftassen; Potli-tassen; Zadeltassen; Boekentassen; Schooltassen; Winkeltassen; Schoudertassen; Trapeziumtassen
zh-CN: 服饰与配饰 > 手提包、钱包与箱包 > 手提包: 双肩手提包; 法棍包; 桶包; 沙滩包; 腰包; 水桶包; 手拿包; 多功能包; 斜挎包; 医生包; 信封包; 折叠式手拿包; 半月包; 流浪包; 晚宴包; 皮手筒手拿包和手袋; 波特利包; 马鞍包; 长形侧背包; 书包; 购物包; 单肩包; 梯形包
bg-BG: Облекло и аксесоари > Дамски чанти, портфейли и калъфи > Дамски чанти: Раници; Чанти тип „багета“; Чанти тип „варел“; Плажни чанти; Чанти за колан; Чанта тип „кофа“; Чанта тип „клъч“; Конвертируеми чанти; Чанти през рамо; Докторски чанти; Чанти „плик“; Чанти с прегъване; Чанти „полумесец“; Чанти „хобо“; Малки вечерни чанти; Чанти тип „маншон“; Чанти с връзки; Чанти тип „седло“; Чанти за учебници; Ученически чанти; Пазарски чанти; Чанти за рамо; Трапецовидни чанти
ko: 의류/액세서리 > 핸드백/지갑/케이스 > 핸드백: 백팩 핸드백; 바게트 핸드백; 배럴 백; 비치백; 벨트 백; 버킷백; 클러치백; 컨버터블 가방; 크로스백; 닥터백; 엔벨로프 클러치; 접이식 클러치; 반달 가방; 호보백; 미노디에르; 머프 클러치/가방; 포틀리 백; 새들백; 새첼백; 책가방; 쇼퍼백; 숄더백; 트라페조이드 백
fr: Vêtements et accessoires > Sacs à main, portefeuilles et étuis > Sacs à main: Sacs à main sacs à dos; Sacs baguette; Sacs polochons; Sacs de plage; Sacs banane; Sacs seau; Sacs pochettes; Sacs convertibles; Sacs à bandoulière; Sacs de docteur; Pochettes enveloppe; Pochettes repliables; Sacs demi-lune; Sacs hobo; Minaudières; Pochettes et sacs; Sacs potli; Sacoches de selle; Sacoches; Cartables; Sacs de shopping; Sacs à bandoulière; Sacs trapézoïdaux
lt-LT: Apranga ir aksesuarai > Rankinės, piniginės ir dėklai > Rankinės: Kuprinės tipo rankinės; „Baguette“ stiliaus rankinės; Apvalūs krepšiai; Paplūdimio krepšiai; Diržo krepšiai; „Bucket“ stiliaus rankinės; Delninukės; Transformuojamos rankinės; Per krūtinę nešiojamos rankinės; Gydytojų krepšiai; Voko formos delninukės; Perlenkiamos delninukės; Pusmėnulio formos rankinės; „Hobo“ stiliaus krepšiai; Minaudierės; Movos-delninukės ir rankinės; „Potli“ maišeliai; Balno formos rankinės; „Satchel“ stiliaus krepšiai; Mokyklinės kuprinės; Pirkinių krepšiai; Ant peties nešiojamos rankinės; Trapecinės rankinės
es: Ropa y accesorios > Bolsos, billeteras y estuches > Bolsos: Bolsos tipo mochila; Bolsos baguette; Bolsas deportivas cilíndricas; Bolsas de playa; Riñoneras; Bolsos bucket; Bolsos de fiesta; Bolsas convertibles; Bolsos bandolera; Bolsos de médico; Bolsos de mano estilo envelope; Bolsos de mano plegables; Bolsos de media luna; Bolsos de estilo hobo; Minaudières; Bolsos y carteras estilo clutch; Bolsos potli; Bolsos estilo alforja; Bolsos estilo cartera; Mochilas escolares; Bolsos estilo shopper; Bolsas de hombro; Bolsos trapezoidales
cs: Oblečení a doplňky > Kabelky, peněženky a pouzdra > Kabelky: Kabelkové batohy; Kabelky typu Baguette; Válcové tašky; Plážové tašky; Ledvinky; Tašky typu Bucket; Dámská psaníčka; Konvertibilní tašky; Tašky typu Crossbody; Doktorské tašky; Obálková psaníčka; Kabelky typu Fold Over Clutch; Tašky ve tvaru půlměsíce; Tašky typu Hobo; Doplňky Minaudiere; Chlupaté kabelky; Kabelky potli; Sedlové brašny; Brašny; Školní tašky; Nákupní tašky; Tašky přes rameno; Kabelky lichoběžníkového tvaru
pl: Ubrania i akcesoria > Torebki, portfele i etui > Torebki: Plecaki-torebki; Torebki bagietki; Torby barrel; Torby plażowe; Torebki na pasek; Torby bucket bag; Torby kopertówki; Torbo-plecaki; Torebki cross body; Torby lekarskie; Torebki kopertowe; Kopertówki składane; Torebki w kształcie półksiężyca; Torebki hobo; Minaudiere; Mufkowe kopertówki i torby; Torebki potli; Torebki saddle bag; Obrączki na serwetki; Tornistry szkolne; Torby zakupowe; Torby na ramię; Torebki trapezowe
da: Tøj og tilbehør > Håndtasker, pengepunge og holdere > Håndtasker: Rygsæktasker; Baguette-håndtasker; Tøndetasker; Strandtasker; Bæltetasker; Spandetasker; Clutch-tasker; Konvertible tasker; Cross body-tasker; Lægetasker; Kuvert-clutches; Foldeclutches; Halvmåne-tasker; Vagabondtasker; Minaudieres; Muff clutches og tasker; Potli-tasker; Sadeltasker; Løftetasker; Skoletasker; Indkøbstasker; Skuldertasker; Trapezposer
tr: Kıyafet ve Aksesuarlar > El Çantaları, Cüzdanlar ve Çantalar > El Çantaları: Sırt el çantaları; Baget Çantalar; Varil Çantalar; Plaj Çantaları; Bel çantaları; Sepet Çantalar; Clutch Çantalar; Dönüştürülebilir Çantalar; Çapraz Çantalar; Doktor Çantaları; Zarf Çantalar; Katlanır Çantalar; Yarım Ay Çantalar; Hobo Çanta; Kutu Çanta; Manşon El Çantaları ve Çantalar; Potli çantalar; Heybe; Askı Çantalar; Okul Çantaları; Shopper Çantalar; Omuz Çantaları; Trapez Çantalar
el: Ένδυση και αξεσουάρ > Τσάντες χειρός, πορτοφόλια & θήκες > Τσάντες: Τσάντες πλάτης (backpacks); Τσάντες ώμου τύπου μπαγκέτας; Τσάντες κυλινδρικού σχήματος; Τσάντες παραλίας; Τσαντάκια μέσης; Τσάντες τύπου Bucket; Τσαντάκια-φάκελοι; Πολυχρηστικές τσάντες; Τσαντάκια ώμου χιαστί; Ιατρικές τσάντες; Τσάντες φάκελος; Διπλωμένες τσάντες; Τσάντες μισοφέγγαρο; Τσάντες Hobo; Τσάντες Minaudieres; Τσαντάκι Muff & Τσάντες; Τσαντάκια potli; Τσάντες χιαστί; Τσάντες Satchel; Σχολικές τσάντες; Τσάντες ώμου Shopper; Τσάντες ώμου; Τσάντες Trapezoid
pt-BR: Vestuário e acessórios > Bolsas, carteiras e estojos > Bolsas: Bolsas mochila; Bolsas baguetes; Bolsas cilíndricas; Sacolas de praia; Pochetes e bolsas de cinto; Bolsas saco; Bolsas de mão; Bolsas conversíveis; Bolsas cruzadas; Maletas médicas; Carteiras envelope; Carteiras com aba; Bolsas meia lua; Bolsas hobo; Minaudieres; Bolsa e carteiras com pelos; Bolsas potli; Bolsas de sela; Bolsas carteiro; Sacolas escolares; Bolsas de compras; Bolsas de ombro; Bolsas trapezoidais
ru: Одежда, обувь и аксессуары > Сумки, кошельки и визитницы > Сумки: Сумки-рюкзаки; Сумки-багеты; Сумки-бочки; Пляжные сумки; Поясные сумки; Сумки-торбы; Клатчи; Сумки-трансформеры; Сумки кросс-боди; Саквояжи; Клатчи-конверты; Складные клатчи; Сумки-полумесяцы; Сумки-хобо; Минодьеры; Клатчи-муфты и сумки-муфты; Сумки потли; Сумки-седла; Сумки-портфели; Школьные ранцы; Сумки-шоперы; Сумки на плечо; Трапециевидные сумки
sl-SI: Oblačila in dodatki > Torbice, denarnice in etuiji > Torbice: Nahrbtne torbice; Baguete torbice; Torbice v obliki sodčka; Torbe za plažo; Torbice za okoli pasu; Vrečaste torbe; Clutch torbice; Večnamenske torbe; Torbe za čez rame; Zdravniške torbe; Pisemske clutch torbice; Preklopne clutch torbice; Torbice v obliki polmeseca; Hobo torbice; Večerne torbice; Mehke clutch torbice in torbe; Potli vrečke; Sedelne torbice; Torbice z naramnicami; Šolske torbe; Nakupovalne torbe; Torbe za čez ramo; Torbe v obliki trapeza
sk-SK: Oblečenie a doplnky > Kabelky, peňaženky a puzdrá > Kabelky: Kabelkové batohy; Kabelky v tvare bagety; Valcové kabelky; Plážové tašky; Ľadvinky; Kabelky v tvare vedierka; Listové kabelky; Konvertibilné tašky; Kabelky cross body; Kufríkové kabelky; Listové kabelky; Sklopné listové kabelky; Kabelky v tvare polmesiaca; Kabelky hobo; Spoločenské kableky; Rukávniky a kabelky v jednom; Kabelky Potli; Sedlové tašky; Aktovky; Školské tašky; Nákupné tašky; Tašky cez rameno; Kabelky v tvare lichobežníka
ja: ファッション・アクセサリー > ハンドバッグ・財布 > ハンドバッグ: バックパックハンドバッグ; バゲットハンドバッグ; バレルバッグ; ビーチバッグ; ベルトバッグ; バケットバッグ; クラッチバッグ; コンバーチブルバッグ; クロスボディバッグ; ドクターバッグ; エンベロープクラッチ; フォールドオーバークラッチ; 半月型バッグ; ホーボーバッグ; ミノディエール; マフクラッチ・バッグ; ポトリバッグ; サドルバッグ; サッチェルバッグ; スクールバッグ; ショッパーバッグ; ショルダーバッグ; 台形バッグ
vi: Quần áo & Phụ kiện > Túi cầm tay, ví, & vali > Túi xách: Túi xách dạng ba lô; Túi xách chữ nhật; Túi trống; Túi đi biển; Túi đeo hông; Túi xô; Túi ví cầm tay; Túi đa năng; Túi đeo chéo; Túi bác sĩ; Túi ví kiểu phong bì; Túi ví gập thân; Túi hình bán nguyệt; Túi Hobo; Túi ví Minaudiere; Túi xách & Túi ví kết hợp bao tay; Túi potli; Túi yên ngựa; Cặp da; Cặp sách; Túi mua sắm; Túi đeo vai; Túi hình thang
ro-RO: Îmbrăcăminte și accesorii > Genți de mână, portofele și huse > Genți de mână: Rucsac de mână; Genți baguette; Genți cilindrice; Genți de plajă; Borsete; Genți bucket; Poșete plic; Genți convertibile; Genți crossbody; Genți doctor; Poșete plic; Poșete pliabile; Genți în formă de semilună; Genți hobo; Poșete tip portofel; Poșete și genți tip manșon; Genți potli; Genți de șa; Genți tip ghiozdan; Ghiozdane; Genți pentru cumpărături; Genți de umăr; Genți trapezoidale
nb: Klær og tilbehør > Vesker, lommebøker og holdere > Vesker: Ryggsekkvesker; Baguettevesker; Tønnevesker; Strandvesker; Beltevesker; Bøttevesker; Clutchvesker; Multifunksjonsvesker; Skuldervesker med lang rem; Doktorvesker; Konvoluttclutcher; Sammenbrettbare clutcher; Halvmånevesker; Hobovesker; Minaudieres; Muffvesker; Potli-vesker; Salvesker; Skulderveske med lokk; Skolevesker; Shoppere; Skuldervesker; Trapesvesker
fi: Vaatteet ja asusteet > Käsilaukut, lompakot ja kotelot > Käsilaukut: Reppulaukut; Pikkulaukut; Pyöreät urheilulaukut; Rantalaukut; Vyölaukut; Isot nyörilaukut; Iltalaukut; Laukut, joiden hihna voidaan poistaa; Ristiin kulkevat olkalaukut; Lääkärilaukut; Kirjelaukut; Taitettavat pikkulaukut; Puolikuulaukut; Isot käsilaukut; Pienoisiltalaukut; Muhvilaukut; Potli-laukut; Satulalaukut; Läpälliset olkalaukut; Koululaukut; Ostoslaukut; Olkalaukut; Suunnikkaan muotoiset laukut
sv: Kläder och accessoarer > Handväskor, plånböcker och fodral > Handväskor: Ryggsäcksväskor; Baguette-handväskor; Barrel-väskor; Strandväskor; Magväskor; Hinkpåsar; Clutchväskor; Vändbara väskor; Axelremsväskor; Doktorsväskor; Kuvertväskor; Vikväskor; Halvmåneväskor; Hobo-väskor; Minaudieres; Muff-väskor; Potli-väskor; Sadelväskor; Påsväskor; Skolväskor; Shoppingväskor; Axelväskor; Trapetspåsar
de: Bekleidung & Accessoires > Handtaschen, Geldbörsen & Etuis > Handtaschen: Rucksack-Handtaschen; Baguette-Handtaschen; Barrel-Taschen; Strandtaschen; Gürteltaschen; Bucket Bags; Clutch-Taschen; Anpassbare Taschen; Umhängetaschen; Arzttaschen; Envelope Clutch-Taschen; Umklappbare Clutches; Halbmondtaschen; Hobo Bags; Minaudières; Muff Clutches & Taschen; Potli-Taschen; Satteltaschen; Schultaschen; Schulranzen; Shopper-Taschen; Schultertaschen; Trapeztaschen
th: เสื้อผ้าและเครื่องประดับ > กระเป๋าถือ กระเป๋าเงิน และที่ใส่ > กระเป๋าถือ: กระเป๋าเป้สะพายหลัง; กระเป๋าถือทรงขนมปัง; กระเป๋าทรงหมอน; กระเป๋าชายหาด; กระเป๋าคาดเอว; กระเป๋าทรงถัง; กระเป๋าคลัตช์; กระเป๋าแบบเปลี่ยนรูปแบบได้; กระเป๋าสะพายขวางลำตัว; กระเป๋าคุณหมอ; กระเป๋าคลัตช์ทรงซองจดหมาย; กระเป๋าคลัตช์แบบพับทบ; กระเป๋าทรงพระจันทร์เสี้ยว; กระเป๋าโฮโบ; กระเป๋าใบเล็กสำหรับออกงานกลางคืน; กระเป๋าและกระเป๋าคลัตช์ขนสัตว์; กระเป๋าโปตลี; กระเป๋าทรงอานม้า; กระเป๋าสะพายข้าง; กระเป๋านักเรียน; กระเป๋าช้อปปิ้ง; กระเป๋าสะพายไหล่; กระเป๋าสานทรงสี่เหลี่ยมคางหมู
it: Abbigliamento e accessori > Borsette, portafogli e custodie > Borsette: Borse zaino; Borse baguette; Borse a cilindro; Borse da spiaggia; Marsupi; Borse a secchiello; Borse clutch; Borse convertibili; Borse comode; Borse da dottore; Clutch a busta; Clutch ripiegabili; Borse a mezzaluna; Borse Hobo; Minaudiere; Clutch e borse in pelliccia; Borse potli; Borse da sella; Borse a spalla; Cartelle; Borse per la spesa; Borse a tracolla; Borse trapezoidali
hr-HR: Odjeća i modni dodaci > Torbe, novčanici i torbice > Torbe: Ruksaci; Baguette torbice; Valjkaste torbice; Torbe za plažu; Torbe za remen; Vrećaste torbe; Torbice bez naramenica; Konvertibilne torbe; Torbe preko ramena; Liječničke torbe; Pismo torbice; Preklopne torbice bez naramenica; Polumjesec torbe; Hobo torbe; Mini večernje torbice; Torbice bez naramenica i torbe za grijanje ruku; Potli torbe; Bisage; Torbe s remenom; Školske torbe; Shopper torbe; Torbe za rame; Trapezoidne torbe